scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VII_V.yaml
     abaagamide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: abaagamide
     abaagamide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: abaagamideg
     abaagamide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ebaagamideg
     abaagamide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: abaagamidemagad
     abaate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: abaate
     abaate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: abaateg
     abaate+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ebaateg
     abaate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: abaatemagad
     abide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: abide
     abide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: abideg
     abide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ebideg
     abide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: abidemagad
     abizigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: abizigaade
     abizigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: abizigaadeg
     abizigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ebizigaadeg
     abiichigaade+VII+Imp+Pos+Neu+0Sg: abiichigaade
     abiichigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: abiichigaadeg
     abiichigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ebiichigaadeg
     abiichigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: abiichigaademagad
     achigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: achigaade
     achigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: achigaadeg
     achigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: echigaadeg
     achigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: achigaademagad
     adisigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: adisigaade
     adisigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: adisigaadeg
     adisigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: edisigaadeg
     adite+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: adite
     adite+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aditeg
     adite+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: editeg
     adite+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aditemagad
     agawaatese+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agawaatese
     agawaatese+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agawaateseg
     agawaatese+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egawaateseg
     agawaatese+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: agawaatesemagad
     agaasademon+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasademon
     agaasademon+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasademog
     agaasademon+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasademog
     agaasate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasate
     agaasate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasateg
     agaasate+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasateg
     agaasate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: agaasatemagad
     agaasibii'igaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasibii'igaade
     agaasibii'igaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasibii'igaadeg
     agaasibii'igaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasibii'igaadeg
     agaasiboode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasiboode
     agaasiboode+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasiboodeg
     agaasiboode+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasiboodeg
     agaasiboode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasiboodemagad
     agaasikode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasikode
     agaasikode+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasikodeg
     agaasikode+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasikodeg
     aginde+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aginde
     aginde+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agindeg
     aginde+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egindeg
     aginjigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aginjigaade 
     aginjigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aginjigaadeg
     aginjigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eginjigaadeg
     aginjigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: aginjigaademagad
     agogwaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agogwaade
     agogwaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agogwaadeg
     agogwaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egogwaadeg
     agogwaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agogwaademagad
     agoke+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agoke 
     agoke+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agokeg
     agoke+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egokeg
     agoke+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agokemagad
     agokiwasigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agokiwasigaade
     agokiwasigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agokiwasigaadeg
     agokiwasigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egokiwasigaadeg
     agokiwate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agokiwate 
     agokiwate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agokiwateg
     agokiwate+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egokiwateg
     agokiwate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agokiwatemagad
     agonde+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agonde
     agonde+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agondeg
     agonde+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egondeg
     agonde+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: agondemagad
     agonjijigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agonjijigaade 
     agonjijigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agonjijigaadeg
     agonjijigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egonjijigaadeg
     agonjijigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: agonjijigaademagad
     agoode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agoode
     agoode+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agoodeg
     agoode+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egoodeg
     agoode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agoodemagad
     agwa'igaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwa'igaade
     agwa'igaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwa'igaadeg
     agwa'igaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwa'igaadeg
     agwana'igaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwana'igaade
     agwana'igaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwana'igaadeg
     agwana'igaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwana'igaadeg
     agwanaate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwanaate
     agwanaate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwanaateg
     agwapide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwapide
     agwapide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwapideg
     agwapide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwapideg
     agwapide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwapidemagad
     agwapijigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwapijigaade
     agwapijigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwapijigaadeg
     agwapijigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwapijigaadeg
     agwapijigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: agwapijigaademagad
     agwaabide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaabide
     agwaabide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaabideg
     agwaabide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwaabideg
     agwaabikide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaabikide 
     agwaabikide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaabikideg
     agwaabikide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwaabikideg
     agwaabikide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaabikidemagad
     agwaabiiginigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaabiiginigaade
     agwaabiiginigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaabiiginigaadeg
     agwaabiiginigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwaabiiginigaadeg
     agwaa'oojigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaa'oojigaade
     agwaa'oojigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaa'oojigaadeg
     agwaa'oojigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwaa'oojigaadeg
     agwaakwa'igaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaakwa'igaade
     agwaakwa'igaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaakwa'igaadeg
     agwaakwa'igaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwaakwa'igaadeg
     agwaasijigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaasijigaade 
     agwaasijigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaasijigaadeg
     agwaasijigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwaasijigaadeg
     agwaasijigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: agwaasijigaademagad
     agwaawebinigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaawebinigaade
     agwaawebinigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaawebinigaadeg
     agwaawebinigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwaawebinigaadeg
     agwaayaaboode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaayaaboode
     agwaayaaboode+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaayaaboodeg
     agwaayaaboode+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwaayaaboodeg
     agwinde+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwinde
     agwinde+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwindeg
     agwinde+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwindeg
     agwinjijigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwinjijigaade
     agwinjijigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwinjijigaadeg
     agwinjijigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwinjijigaadeg
     ajidagoode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ajidagoode
     ajidagoode+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ajidagoodeg
     ajidagoode+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ejidagoodeg
     ajidagoode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: ajidagoodemagad
     ajidakide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ajidakide
     ajidakide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ajidakideg
     ajidakide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ejidakideg
     ajidinigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ajidinigaade 
     ajidinigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ajidinigaadeg
     ajidinigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ejidinigaadeg
     akooshkine+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akooshkine
     akooshkine+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akooshkineg
     akooshkine+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ekooshkineg
     akwamon+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwamon
     akwamon+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwamog
     akwamon+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ekwamog 
     akwaabiigizhigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwaabiigizhigaade
     akwaabiigizhigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwaabiigizhigaadeg
     akwaabiigizhigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ekwaabiigizhigaadeg
     akwaate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwaate
     akwaate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwaateg
     akwaate+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ekwaateg
     angobide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: angobide
     angobide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: angobideg
     angobide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: engobideg
     angobide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: angobidemagad
     angode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: angode
     angode+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: angodeg
     angode+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: engodeg
     angwaakide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: angwaakide
     angwaakide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: angwaakideg
     angwaakide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: engwaakideg
     angwaakide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: angwaakidemagad
     anibegoode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anibegoode
     anibegoode+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anibegoodeg
     anibegoode+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enibegoodeg
     animamon+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animamon
     animamon+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animamog
     animamon+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimamog
     animaabate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animaabate
     animaabate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animaabateg
     animaabate+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimaabateg
     animaabate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animaabatemagad
     animaaboode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animaaboode
     animaaboode+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animaaboodeg
     animaaboode+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimaaboodeg
     animaaboode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animaaboodemagad
     animibide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animibide
     animibide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animibideg
     animibide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimibideg
     animibide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animibidemagad
     animidaabaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animidaabaade
     animidaabaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animidaabaadeg
     animidaabaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimidaabaadeg
     animikiiwaanakwagoode+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animikiiwaanakwagoode
     animikiiwaanakwagoode+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animikiiwaanakwagoodeg
     animikiiwaanakwagoode+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimikiiwaanakwagoodeg
     animikonigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animikonigaade 
     animikonigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animikonigaadeg
     animikonigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimikonigaadeg
     animikonigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: animikonigaademagad
     animikose+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animikose 
     animikose+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animikoseg
     animikose+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimikoseg
     animikose+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: animikosemagad
     animikosijigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animikosijigaade
     animikosijigaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animikosijigaadeg
     animikosijigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimikosijigaadeg
     animipon+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animipon
     animipon+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animipog
     animipon+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimipog
     animise+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animise 
     animise+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animiseg
     animise+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimiseg
     animise+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animisemagad
     animwewebide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animwewebide
     animwewebide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animwewebideg
     animwewebide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimwewebideg
     animwewebide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: animwewebidemagad
     anishinaabewibii'igaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anishinaabewibii'igaade
     anishinaabewibii'igaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anishinaabewibii'igaadeg
     anishinaabewibii'igaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enishinaabewibii'igaadeg
     anishinaabewibii'igaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: anishinaabewibii'igaademagad
     anishinaabewinikaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anishinaabewinikaade
     anishinaabewinikaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anishinaabewinikaadeg
     anishinaabewinikaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enishinaabewinikaadeg
     anishinaabewinikaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: anishinaabewinikaademagad
     apagajise+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apagajise
     apagajise+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apagajiseg
     apagajise+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epagajiseg
     apagajise+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apagajisemagad
     apagijigaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apagijigaade
     apagijigaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epagijigaadeg
     apide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apide
     apide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apideg
     apide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epideg
     apide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apidemagad
     apigwaade+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apigwaade
     apigwaade+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apigwaadeg
     apigwaade+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epigwaadeg
     apiichibide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apiichibide
     apiichibide+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiichibideg
     apiichibide+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiichibideg
     apiichibide+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: apiichibidemagad
     apiitaginde+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitaginde
     apiitaginde+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitagindeg
